Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1003
Site; condemnation; payment.

If the owner or owners and the committee cannot agree on the price, value, or title of land as provided in section 18-1002, within a period of negotiation extending not more than ten days from the date of appointment of the committee by the governing body, the committee shall report the fact of disagreement to the mayor and city council or to the chairperson and village board of trustees, as the case may be. The city clerk or village clerk shall immediately notify in writing the Adjutant General to that effect, whereupon it shall be the duty of the Attorney General, collaborating with the city attorney or village attorney, to institute proper legal proceedings to acquire the land for state use through the exercise of the power of eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724. Payment of the award made or any other necessary costs or expenses incident to the condemnation suit shall be made by the city or village.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 10, § 1, p. 71;

Laws 1941, c. 130, § 7, p. 493;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1801;

R.S.1943, § 18-1003;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 65, p. 477;

Laws 1959, c. 54, § 1, p. 246;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 69.